Washington statutes.
RCW 4.56.060

Judgment in case of setoff—When equal or less than plaintiff's debt.

If the amount of the setoff, duly established, be equal to the plaintiff's debt or demand, judgment shall be rendered that the plaintiff take nothing by his or her action; if it be less than the plaintiff's debt or demand, the plaintiff shall have judgment for the residue only.

[ 2011 c 336 s 109; Code 1881 s 503; 1877 p 108 s 507; RRS s 271 1/2.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 54(b).